Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1225
Mortgage, defined.

Mortgage shall mean any of such classes of liens as are commonly given to secure advances on or the unpaid purchase price of real property under the laws of the state, together with the credit instruments, if any, secured thereby.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 12.